en: Reconstituted crustacean soup
fr: Soupes de crustacés reconstituée

en: Vegetable soups
bg: Зеленчукова супа
ca: Sopes vegetals
da: Grøntsagssuppe
de: Gemüsesuppen
es: Sopas de verduras y hortalizas, Sopas de verduras, Sopas de hortalizas
fi: kasviskeitot
fr: Soupes de légumes
he: מרקי ירקות
hr: Juhe od povrća
hu: Zöldséglevesek
it: Zuppe di verdura
ja: 野菜スープ
lt: Sriubos su daržovėmis
nl: Groentesoepen
pl: Zupy warzywne, Zupy jarzynowe
pt: Sopas vegetais
ru: Овощные супы
sv: Grönsakssoppor
zh: 蔬菜汤

en: Reheatable soups, Soupes liquides, Soupe liquide
de: Aufwärmbare Suppen, Wiederaufwärmbare Suppen
fi: Uudelleenlämmitettävät keitot
fr: Soupes à réchauffer
he: מרקים לחימום חוזר
hr: Juhe koje se mogu podgrijati
it: Zuppe pronte
lt: Pašildomos sriubos
nl: Opwarmbare soepen

en: Mushroom soups
fr: Soupes aux champignons
hr: Juhe od gljiva
ja: きのこスープ
lt: Sriubos su grybais
nl: Paddestoelsoepen
sv: Svampsoppor
tr: Mantar çorbası

en: Dehydrated mushroom soup
fr: Soupes aux champignons déshydratée
hr: Dehidrirana juha od gljiva
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su grybais, Dehidratuotos sriubos su grybais

en: Chicken and vegetables soup
fi: Kana-vihanneskeitot
fr: Soupe à la volaille et aux légumes
hr: Juha od piletine i povrća
lt: Sriubos su vištiena ir daržovėmis
nl: Kippensoep met groente

en: Dehydrated soup with chicken and vegetables
fr: Soupe à la volaille et aux légumes déshydratée
hr: Dehidrirana juha s piletinom i povrćem
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su vištiena ir daržovėmis

en: Chicken soups
fr: Soupes à la volaille
hr: Pileće juhe
lt: Sriubos su vištiena
nl: Kippensoepen, Kippesoepen
pl: Zupy z kurczakiem

en: Chicken and vermicelli soup
fr: Soupes à la volaille et aux vermicelles
hr: Pileća i vermicelli juha
ja: チキンスープ
lt: Sriubos su vištiena ir vermišeliais
nl: Kippensoepen met vermicelli

en: Reheatable chicken and vermicelli soup
fr: Soupes à la volaille et aux vermicelles à réchauffer
hr: Podgrijava pileća i vermicelli juha
lt: Pašildomos sriubos su vištiena ir vermišeliais

en: Tomato and vermicelli soups
fr: Soupes à la tomate et aux vermicelles
hr: Juhe od rajčice i vermicelli
lt: Sriubos su pomidorais ir vermišeliais

en: Dehydrated tomato and vermicelli soup
fr: Soupes à la tomate et aux vermicelles déshydratée
hr: Dehidrirana juha od rajčica i vermicelli
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su pomidorais ir vermišeliais

en: Dehydrated cereals and vegetables soup
fr: Soupe aux céréales et aux légumes déshydratée
hr: Juha od dehidriranih žitarica i povrća
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su grūdais ir daržovėmis

en: Dehydrated chicken and vermicelli soup
fr: Soupe à la volaille et aux vermicelles déshydratée
hr: Dehidrirana pileća i vermicelli juha
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su vištiena ir vermišeliais

en: Chorba frik soup with meat and frik
fr: Soupe chorba frik à base de viande et de frik

en: Dehydrated minestrone soup
fr: Soupe minestrone déshydratée
hr: Dehidrirana juha minestrone
lt: Greito paruošimo minestrone sriubos

en: Reheatable tomato soup
fr: Soupe à la tomate à réchauffer
he: מרק עגבניות לחימום חוזר
hr: Podgrijava juha od rajčice
lt: Pašildomos pomidorų sriubos

en: Dehydrated tomato soup
fr: Soupe à la tomate déshydratée
hr: Dehidrirana juha od rajčice
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su pomidorais

en: Reheatable tomatoes and vermicelli soup
fr: Soupe à la tomate et aux vermicelles à réchauffer
hr: Podgrijava juha od rajčica i vermicelli
lt: Pašildomos sriubos su pomidorais ir vermišeliais

en: Reheatable mixed vegetables soup
fr: Soupe aux légumes variés à réchauffer
hr: Podgrijava juha od miješanog povrća
lt: Pašildomos įvairių daržovių sriubos